Mississippi, session 2026, SB2486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-7-1001, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-7-1001.  (1)  As used in this article, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed below, unless otherwise indicated by the context: (a) "Board" means the State Board of Education. (b) "Commission" means the Standing Commission on School District Efficiency authorized in this section. (c) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (2)  The State Board of Education is hereby authorized to establish a Standing Commission on School District Efficiency.  The commission shall meet and study the operations, rules, policies and regulations in school districts on an ongoing basis for the purpose of identifying opportunities to increase efficiencies, and to determine appropriate efficiency standards that should be considered for accreditation standards.  The commission shall report annually its findings and recommendations to the * * * State Board of Education board, and the * * * State Board of Education board may make its report and recommendations annually to the Legislature seeking legislative support to achieve efficiencies in school districts.  In establishing the * * * Standing Commission on School District Efficiency commission, the * * * State Board of Education board shall provide that the membership not be less than six (6) members.  The * * * State Board of Education board shall appoint school district employees proficient in the areas of fiscal management, procurement, data processing or other fields of school business, with at least one (1) member being appointed from each congressional district.  The commission shall meet on a date designated by the State Superintendent of Education and organize by selecting a chairman and adopt rules for conducting business. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses from any available funds for attending official meetings of the commission.  The * * * State Department of Education department shall provide necessary administrative and clerical support for the functions of the commission. (3)  The commission shall compile the most recent data available which reflects the following: (i)  The total public school student population for the entire State of Mississippi; (ii)  The total number of students enrolled in the public school system in each county; (iii) For each school district, the name, categorization, county or counties in which it is situated, total number of students enrolled, net student enrollment, number of schools, grades served by each school, enrollment in each grade level per school, and capacity of each school; (iv)  The total and per-pupil administrative costs of each district, using the same funds, functions and objects that the department is required to use under Section 37-151-203(1)(d) in the annual determination of the base student cost under the Mississippi Student Funding Formula; (v)  The density classifications of each district required under Section 3-151-85 for purposes of determining the district's transportation costs using the scale of allowable costs developed by the department; (vi)  The total number of sparsely populated districts, as defined under Section 37-151-201, in the state; (vii)  The accreditation level of each district; and (viii)  Such other objective information that may be deemed relevant by the commission in addressing the issue of the holistic educational efficiency and opportunities of school districts. (b)  The information gathered by the commission under this subsection shall be compiled and presented, by county and school district, in a user-friendly format that easily allows for comparisons to be made between districts under each category of information. (4)  In addition to the data compiled under subsection (6) of this section, the commission shall include the following information: (a)  An in-depth analysis of administrative consolidation, contemplating all matters that must be considered in determining whether reducing the number of school districts in the state would be feasible or advantageous; (b)  An in-depth analysis of intradistrict consolidation, contemplating all matters that must be considered in determining whether reducing the number of schools within a district would be feasible or advantageous; (c)  A list of the benefits and disadvantages of reducing or not reducing the number of districts in each specific county having two (2) or more school districts; (d)  A list of the benefits and disadvantages of reducing or not reducing the number of schools serving the same grade level in each district with multiple schools serving the same grade level; (e)  A projection of the most feasible minimum size of a district that is capable of promoting a wholesome educational experience, complete with advanced placement courses, career technical education courses, athletics and other extracurricular activities; (f)  A projection of the savings in state and local funding which would be achieved through the consolidation of districts in each specific county having two (2) or more school districts; and (g)  A recommended procedure to accomplish the administrative consolidation of districts in each county having two (2) or more school districts, or intradistrict consolidation of schools within a district, and a reasonable time frame in which the consolidation could be achieved, with each consolidation categorized in a phase spanning two (2) school years, the first phase beginning July 1, 2028, and ending June 30, 2030, and each subsequent phase beginning and ending one (1) year later than the previous phase.  The second school year of a phase shall be the first school year in which a newly consolidated district is in effect; therefore, a consolidated district in the first phase shall become effective on July 1, 2029. (5)  In order to quantify and affirm the number of school districts necessary within the state, if determined that single-county districts are not in the best interest of the children and families of this state, the commission shall use the following criteria: (a)  An assessment of the largest districts in the state; (b)  An assessment of the smallest districts in the state; (c)  An assessment of previously consolidated districts in counties having two (2) or more school districts; (d)  An assessment of districts whose boundaries are situated within two (2) counties; (e)  The administrative, operational and programs of instruction and curriculum of those schools accredited at the highest and lowest levels of performance on the accreditation rating scale; (f)  The socio-economic demographics of each district with greater populations of at-risk students; and (g)  Levels of social, economic, academic and cultural exposure. (6)  The commission, with its support staff from the department, shall prepare a written report, to be presented to the Legislature and the Governor by November 30, 2026, and on November 30 of every year thereafter, on the study that includes the data and information specified in subsections (3), (4) and (5) of this section. (7)  As used in this section, the term "consolidated district" includes consolidated line school districts. SECTION 2.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-7-1003, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-7-1003.  (1)  As used in this section, the term "consolidated district" includes consolidated line school districts. (2)  On the basis of the commission report required in Section 37-7-1001(6), the Legislature, in its 2027 Regular Session and subsequent regular sessions, shall determine through legislation which school districts shall be consolidated, and in which phase under Section 37-7-1001(4)(e) each district consolidation shall be placed. (3)  Any school district required by the Legislature to consolidate may submit to the commission its own consolidation plan, under guidelines adopted by the commission, no later than November 30 of the first school year of its consolidation phase.  If a district does not submit its own plan to the commission by the deadline, or if the commission, with the concurrence of the board, rejects the district's plan, the commission shall develop its own plan to consolidate the district. (4)  If the commission develops its own consolidation plan, it shall create a transitional governing board for the future consolidated district.  The transitional board shall begin functioning on January 1 of the first school year of its consolidation phase.  The transitional board shall consist of five (5) members selected by the commission. (5)  The full calendar year before the consolidated district is scheduled to take effect: (a)  The department shall train the members of the transitional board on the duties it shall perform during the transition to consolidation and in the first school year of the newly consolidated district; (b)  The members of the transitional board shall attend the meetings of the school boards of the existing districts to be consolidated; (c)  The existing districts shall submit monthly reports to the transitional board consisting of information as determined by the department; and (d)  The transitional board shall begin searching for a superintendent for the future consolidated district. (6)  On January 1 of the calendar year in which the consolidated district is scheduled to take effect, the school boards of the existing districts shall be abolished, and the transitional board shall assume their duties on behalf of the existing districts through June 30.  On July 1, the consolidated district shall take effect, governed by the transitional board until school board members for the consolidated district can be elected and installed.  During the time in which the transitional board is performing the duties of a school board, both before and after consolidation, board members shall be entitled to compensation as provided in Section 37-6-13.  The transitional board shall be abolished upon the constitution of an elected school board as provided by law. SECTION 3.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-7-1005, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-7-1005.  (1)  No later than October 31, 2027, each school district not scheduled for consolidation by the Legislature shall compile and submit to the commission the most recent data available which reflects the following: (a)  The total number of students enrolled in each school in the district by grade, and the net enrollment of students in each such school; (b)  The personnel employed in each school in the district, by title and annual salary or hourly wage; (c)  A list of buildings at each school and other properties in the district, and a description of the condition of each; and (d)  A list of the district's expenses at each school or property within the last five (5) fiscal years. (2)  In addition to the data compiled under subsection (1) of this section, the school district shall include the following information: (a)  An in-depth analysis of all matters that must be considered in determining whether reducing the number of schools in the district would be feasible or advantageous; (b)  A list of the benefits and disadvantages of reducing or not reducing the number of schools in the district; (c)  A projection of the most feasible minimum size of a school that is capable of promoting a wholesome educational experience, athletics and other extracurricular activities; (d)  A projection of the savings in state and local funding which would be achieved through the consolidation of schools in the district; and (e)  A recommended procedure to accomplish the consolidation of schools in the district and a reasonable time frame in which the consolidation could be achieved, and if not by the following school year, reasons why a delay would be needed. (3)  The commission, with its support staff from the department, shall prepare a written report, to be presented to the board and the department by November 30, 2027, on the study that includes the data and information specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, together with the commission's judgment and supporting reasons as to each district's conclusions regarding school consolidation. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.